Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 35-1301 to 35-1330 shall be known and may be cited as the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 5.